North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 3. Control over Child-Caring Facilities.

§ 110-45.
Institution has authority of parent or guardian.

Every indigent child which may be placed in any orphanage, children’s home, or child-placing institution in this State, which shall be an institution existing under and by virtue of the laws of this State, shall be under the control of the authorities of such institution so long as, under the rules and regulations of such institution, the child is entitled to remain in the same. The authority of the institution shall be the same as that of a parent or guardian before the child was placed in the institution; but such authority shall extend only to the person of the child.

History.

1917, c. 133, s. 1; C.S., s. 5063.

§ 110-46.
Regulations of institution not abrogated.

Nothing in this Article shall be construed in any way to abrogate any of the rules and regulations of such institutions insofar as the rules and regulations have for their purpose the welfare and protection of the institutions.

History.

1917, c. 133, s. 2; C.S., s. 5064.

§ 110-47.
Enticing a child from institution.

It is unlawful for any person to entice or attempt to entice, persuade, harbor, or conceal, or in any manner induce any indigent child to leave any of the institutions hereinbefore mentioned without the knowledge or consent of the authorities of such institutions. But this Article shall not interfere with a mother’s right to her child in case she becomes able to sustain her child; and the county commissioners in the county in which she resides shall in case of doubt have authority to recommend to the institution concerning the child.

History.

1917, c. 133, s. 3; C.S., s. 5065.

§ 110-48.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Any person violating any of the provisions of

G.S. 110-45

, 110-46 and 110-47 shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1917, c. 133, s. 4; C.S., s. 5066; 1993, c. 539, s. 822; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 110-49.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 637, s. 3.